Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1359
Act; applicability.

The Uniform Registration of Canadian Money Judgments Act applies to the registration of a Canadian judgment entered in a proceeding that is commenced in Canada on or after August 28, 2021.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 23.